Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1620
Contracts and agreements in restraint of trade; void; voidable.

All contracts and agreements made in restraint of trade by coconspirators in violation of the provisions of section 59-1603, 59-1604, or 59-1605 shall be void. All contracts and agreements made between a conspirator and an innocent party in violation of the provisions of section 59-1603, 59-1604, or 59-1605 shall be voidable by the innocent party.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 27.